Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2408.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6593YH (2) 91 sb/js H.F. 2408 Section 1. IOWA FLOOD CENTER ââ APPROPRIATION. There 1 is appropriated from the general fund of the state to the 2 state board of regents for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 3 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the following amount, or so 4 much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 5 designated: 6 For purposes of supporting a water quality monitoring 7 network under the supervision of the Iowa flood center of the 8 state university of Iowa: 9 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 600,000 10